Washington statutes.
RCW 10.31.040

Officer may break and enter.

(1) To make an arrest in criminal actions, the officer may break open any outer or inner door, or windows of a dwelling house or other building, or any other enclosure, if, after notice of his or her office and purpose, he or she be refused admittance.

(2) An officer may not seek and a court may not issue a search or arrest warrant granting an express exception to the requirement for the officer to provide notice of his or her office and purpose when executing the warrant.

[ 2021 c 320 s 8; 2010 c 8 s 1030; Code 1881 s 1170; 1854 p 129 s 179; RRS s 2082.]